Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1627
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to implement the Direct Primary Care Pilot Program Act.

Laws 2018, LB1119, § 10.